Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 13 CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT ACT
26-13-122.7. Administrative lien and attachment of insurance claim payments, awards, and settlements - reporting - rules - fund.

The state child support enforcement agency, or its agent, may issue a notice of administrative lien and attachment to any person, insurance company, or agency to attach insurance claim payments, awards, or settlements due to an obligor who is responsible for the past-due support of a child or children on whose behalf an obligee is receiving services from the state's child support enforcement agency or a delegate child support enforcement unit pursuant to this article 13. The state child support enforcement agency and insurance companies must participate in the child support lien network insurance data match, or a similar program, to facilitate discovery of potential claim payments, awards, or settlements.

On or before January 30, 2018, the department of human services shall submit a report to the health and human services committee of the senate and the public health care and human services committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, concerning the results of the voluntary participation by insurance companies in the child support lien network insurance data match pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1).

For the purposes of this section, an insurance claim payment, award, or settlement is limited to an individual who receives money in excess of one thousand dollars after making a claim for payment under an insurance policy for:

Personal injury under a policy for liability;

Wrongful death;

Workers' compensation; or

A life insurance policy or annuity contract and the proceeds from the sale or assignment of life insurance or annuity benefits.

For the purposes of this section, an insurance claim payment:

Only includes the portion of the claim, award, or settlement payable to the obligor or the obligor's representative. Any portion of an insurance claim payment that replaces wages or provides income in lieu of wages is subject to the limitations set forth in section 13-54-104 (2), C.R.S.

Does not include any moneys payable as attorney fees, witness fees, court costs, reasonable litigation expenses, documented unpaid expenses incurred for medical treatment causally related to the claim, or any portion of a claim based on damage or a loss of real or personal property.

Upon the request of an insurance company, an individual with an insurance claim payment, award, or settlement governed by this section shall provide to the insurer his or her current address, date of birth, and social security number;

The insurance company making the request may inform the claimant that the request is being made in accordance with this section for the purpose of assisting the state's child support enforcement agency in enforcing child support liens pursuant to section 14-10-122, C.R.S.; and

An insurer shall not make payment to a claimant who refuses to provide the information required by this section. An insurer that declines to make payment on this basis is exempt from suit and immune to liability under this section and any other section in a common law action in law or equity.

The state board shall promulgate rules concerning appropriate procedures that the state department or the state's child support enforcement agency shall follow regarding certain insurance claim payments, awards, or settlements, including claim payments, awards, or settlements to multiple parties. The rules must identify factors the state's child support enforcement agency shall consider in determining whether to attach the claim payment, award, or settlement, or any portion of such claim payment, award, or settlement.

An insurance company, agency, or central reporting organization, or the directors, agents, or employees of an insurer, insurance company, or central reporting organization, are not liable, and no cause of action accrues, for damages based upon any actions or omissions taken or made in good faith pursuant to this section.

The administrative lien and attachment require the person, insurance company, or agency to withhold the insurance claim payment, award, or settlement. An administrative lien and attachment for the collection from insurance claim payments, awards, or settlements for the payment of past-due child support obligations or past-due maintenance or maintenance when combined with child support obligations is continuing and remains in effect until such amount is satisfied or is released in writing by the state child support enforcement agency.

In order to attach and collect insurance claim payments, awards, or settlements for the payment of past-due child support or past-due maintenance or maintenance when combined with child support obligations, the state child support enforcement agency is authorized to serve, by first-class mail or electronically, if mutually agreed upon, a notice of administrative lien and attachment on any person, insurance company, or agency holding insurance claim payments, awards, or settlements that are owed to an obligor. A copy of the administrative lien and attachment shall be provided to the obligor and must include information on the obligor's right to object to the administrative lien and attachment and to request an administrative review pursuant to rules promulgated by the state board.

Any remittance of moneys deducted or withheld by a person, insurance company, or agency pursuant to this section must include the obligor's name and identifying number as assigned by the state child support enforcement agency or the family support registry. The moneys must be remitted to the family support registry pursuant to section 26-13-114.

The state child support enforcement agency may recover from the money collected any fees assessed upon the state child support enforcement agency in its efforts to attach insurance claim payments, awards, and settlements. Fees collected pursuant to this subsection (6) must be deposited in the child support insurance lien fund created pursuant to subsection (9) of this section.

This section applies to all child support obligations and to all maintenance or maintenance when combined with child support obligations that were ordered as part of any proceeding, regardless of when the order was entered. All child support obligors are subject to the notice of administrative lien and attachment as described in subsection (4) of this section.

A lien or assignment perfected on any insurance claim payment, award, or settlement prior to the receipt of the administrative lien and attachment issued by the state child support enforcement agency shall be honored prior to the administrative lien and attachment issued by the state child support enforcement agency. The state child support enforcement agency shall receive the balance, if any, of the remaining insurance claim payment, award, or settlement up to the amount owed by the obligor.

There is created in the state treasury the child support insurance lien fund, referred to in this subsection (9) as the "fund". The fund consists of any money credited to it from fees collected pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, and any other money appropriated or transferred to the fund by the general assembly. Money in the fund shall be appropriated to the state department to pay costs related to participating in the child support lien network. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund. Any money appropriated to the fund for the 2018-19 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter that is unexpended and unencumbered at the end of the applicable fiscal year does not revert to the general fund and must remain in the fund.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1165), ch. 157, p. 491, § 3, effective January 1, 2017.

L. 2018:

(1)(a) and (6) amended and (9) added, (HB 18-1363), ch. 389, p. 2322, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

IP(1)(c)(I), (1)(c)(I)(B), and (1)(c)(I)(C) amended and (1)(c)(I)(D) added, (HB 21-1220), ch. 212, p.1129, § 7, effective January 1, 2022.

26-13-123. Drivers' licenses - suspension for nonpayment of child support - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Child support order" means any administrative or court order requiring the payment of child support, child support arrears, child support debt, retroactive support, or medical support, whether or not such order is combined with an order for maintenance.

"Driver's license" means a license issued by the department of revenue pursuant to article 2 of title 42, C.R.S.

"Notice of compliance" means the notice issued pursuant to subsection (5) of this section that an obligor is in compliance with a child support order.

"Notice of failure to comply" means the notice issued pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

"Notice of noncompliance" means the notice issued pursuant to subsection (3) of this section that an obligor is not in compliance with a child support order.

"Obligor" has the same meaning as in section 26-13.5-102 (12).

The state child support enforcement agency shall, at least on an annual basis, identify as obligors subject to the provisions of this section any person who owes the following and has failed to execute and comply with the terms of an agreement to pay:

Child support debt to the state pursuant to section 14-14-104, C.R.S.;

Arrearages or medical support, as requested as part of an enforcement action pursuant to article 5 of title 14, C.R.S.;

Child support arrearages, retroactive child support, or medical support that is the subject of enforcement services provided pursuant to section 26-13-106.

An obligor is subject to the provisions of this section to the extent that any child support debt, arrearage balance, retroactive support, or medical support is owed and remains outstanding.

At least on an annual basis, the state child support enforcement agency shall issue a written notice of noncompliance to any obligor identified in subsection (2) of this section. The notice of noncompliance shall include the name and last-known address of the obligor and shall be sent to the obligor's last-known address.

The notice of noncompliance shall include the following information:

That the state child support enforcement agency's records indicate the obligor owes a duty of support under a child support order;

That the state child support enforcement agency's records indicate the obligor has not complied with a child support order; or has a child support debt, child support arrearage balance, or owes retroactive child support; or has failed to provide the child medical support pursuant to a court or administrative order;

That the obligor has failed to execute an agreement to repay the child support debt or child support arrearage balance or to remain current on the required child support payments or has failed to abide by the terms of the agreement if an agreement has been executed by the obligor;

That the obligor may, in writing and no later than thirty days after the date of the notice, request an administrative review to object to the notice of noncompliance and that failure to request such a review within the time specified shall result in the issuance of a notice of failure to comply pursuant to subsection (4) of this section;

That the sole grounds for an administrative review shall be a mistake in the identity of the obligor; a disagreement regarding the amount of the child support debt, arrearage balance, retroactive support, or medical support; or a showing that all child support payments were made when due;

That the delegate child support enforcement unit must conduct an administrative review within thirty days after receipt of the obligor's written request; and

That the obligor may request in writing an administrative review from the state child support enforcement agency within thirty days after the date of the delegate child support enforcement unit's decision.

No later than thirty days after the date of the notice of noncompliance, the obligor may request in writing that the delegate child support enforcement unit conduct an administrative review pursuant to rules and regulations developed by the state board of human services to implement the provisions of this article.

No later than thirty days after the date of the delegate child support enforcement unit's decision, the obligor may request in writing an administrative review from the state child support enforcement agency.

The sole grounds to be determined at the administrative review shall be a mistake in the identity of the obligor; a disagreement with the amount of the child support debt, arrearage balance, retroactive support, or medical support; or a showing that all child support payments were made when due.

The decision of the state child support enforcement agency shall be final agency action and may be reviewed as provided in section 24-4-106, C.R.S.

A notice of failure to comply pursuant to subsection (4) of this section shall not be sent to the department of revenue unless the obligor has failed to request a review within the time specified or until a hearing has been concluded and all rights of review have been exhausted.

After the rights of review pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of this section have been exhausted or the time within which such review may be requested has elapsed, the state child support enforcement agency shall:

Issue the notice of failure to comply to the department of revenue; and

Send a copy of such notice to the obligor to the obligor's last-known address.

Upon receipt of the notice of failure to comply from the state child support enforcement agency, the department of revenue shall suspend the obligor's driver's license pursuant to section 42-2-127.5, C.R.S. Such suspension shall not be grounds for a hearing or any other administrative review by the department of revenue. The department of revenue shall refer all requests for a hearing regarding the obligor's child support order to the state child support enforcement agency for referral to the delegate child support enforcement unit.

The department of revenue may issue a probationary driver's license pursuant to section 42-2-127.5, C.R.S.

The department of revenue shall only reinstate a driver's license upon receipt of a notice of compliance from the delegate child support enforcement unit that indicates the obligor has complied with the court or administrative order or has agreed upon a payment plan approved by the delegate child support enforcement unit. The delegate child support enforcement unit is not required to issue a notice of compliance based upon approval of a payment plan for an obligor who has received a second notice of failure to comply until such obligor has complied with such payment plan for at least three months.

Nothing in this section shall limit the ability of the department of revenue to revoke or suspend a license, or to take any other disciplinary action against a driver, on any other grounds.

The department of revenue, or any person acting on the department's behalf, shall not be liable for any actions taken to suspend the obligor's driver's license pursuant to this section.

The state board of human services shall promulgate rules and regulations, pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., as are necessary to implement this section.

The department of revenue is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations, pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., as may be necessary to implement this section.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 1298, § 42, effective July 1, 1997.)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 584, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1)(b), (3)(a), and (7) amended, p. 1298, § 42, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(3)(a) amended, p. 517, § 5, effective August 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997.

26-13-124. Privatization of child support enforcement programs.

The state department shall consult with the counties to determine what services of the child support enforcement program may be advantageous to privatize. The state department is authorized to procure such services on behalf of participating counties if the participating counties and the state department agree to such procurement.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1911, § 116, effective August 5.

26-13-125. State directory of new hires - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Employee" means a natural person who is employed by an employer in this state for compensation, which employer is required to report the compensation to the federal internal revenue service. "Employee" includes a self-employed or contracted employee for whom the employer is required to report compensation to the federal internal revenue service. "Employee" does not include an employee hired to perform intelligence or counterintelligence functions for an agency of the United States government, as those terms are defined in the federal "Intelligence Organization Act of 1992", 50 U.S.C. sec. 401a, when the head of the agency has determined that reporting the employee could endanger the safety of the employee or compromise an ongoing investigation or intelligence mission.

"Employer" means a person or entity doing business in the state that engages an employee for compensation and for whom the employer is required to report the compensation to the federal internal revenue service. "Employer" also includes any governmental entity and any labor organization.

"Labor organization" means any organization that exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining or of dealing with employers concerning grievances, terms, or conditions of employment or of providing other mutual aid or protection in connection with employment.

"Newly hired employee" means an employee who:

Has not previously been employed by the employer; or

Was previously employed by the employer but has been separated from his or her prior employment for at least sixty consecutive days.

The state department, or its agent, shall establish and maintain a state directory of new hires on and after October 1, 1997, for the purpose of locating newly hired employees for the purposes of establishing, enforcing, or modifying child support obligations and for other purposes specified in paragraph (b) of subsection (8) of this section.

Effective October 1, 1997, each employer shall submit to the state directory of new hires a copy of the W-4 form, the W-9 form, or, at the option of the employer, an equivalent form for each newly hired employee in Colorado. The report may be transmitted to the state department by first class mail, magnetically, or electronically. The report must contain the newly hired employee's name, address, social security number, and the date services for remuneration were first performed by the newly hired employee. The report must contain the name and address of the employer and the identifying number assigned to the employer under section 6109 of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended. An employer is not liable for furnishing information pursuant to this section. An employer is not required to submit to the state directory of new hires a report concerning any employee hired for less than thirty days.

Beginning not later than May 1, 1998, the state child support enforcement agency shall conduct automated comparisons of the social security numbers reported by employers pursuant to this section and the social security numbers appearing in the records of the family support registry for cases being enforced under the state plan. The state department may contract for the performance of the comparisons required by this subsection (4) with another governmental agency or a private entity.

An employer that has employees who are employed in two or more states and that transmits reports magnetically or electronically may designate one state to which the employer shall submit reports. Any multistate employer that elects to transmit all reports to one state shall notify the secretary of the federal department of health and human services, in writing, which state the employer has designated for purposes of reporting.

All employers shall report a newly hired employee within twenty calendar days after the date the employer hires the employee or, at the election of the employer, at the time of the first regularly scheduled payroll following the date of hire if such payroll is subsequent to the expiration of the twenty-day period. Reports submitted magnetically or electronically shall be submitted by two monthly transmissions, when necessary, and in all instances, the report shall be transmitted no more than twenty calendar days after the date of hire or, at the election of the employer, at the time of the first regularly scheduled payroll following the date of hire if such payroll is subsequent to the expiration of the twenty-day period.

Within five business days after receipt of a report from an employer concerning a newly hired employee, the state child support enforcement agency shall enter the information into the state directory of new hires.

Within two business days after the date the information regarding a newly hired employee is entered into the state directory of new hires, the state child support enforcement agency shall transmit an income assignment to the employer of the employee directing the employer to withhold an amount equal to the monthly child support obligation, including any past-due support obligation of the employee.

Within three business days after the date the information regarding a newly hired employee is entered into the state directory of new hires, the state directory of new hires shall furnish the information to the national directory of new hires.

No later than two years after the date the information regarding a newly hired employee is entered into the state directory of new hires, the state child support enforcement agency shall remove such name and information from the directory.

Information contained within the reports shall be made available to delegate child support enforcement units and their agents in order to locate individuals for purposes of establishing paternity or for purposes of establishing, modifying, or enforcing child support obligations.

Information contained within the reports must be made available to the administrators of the following programs for purposes of establishing or verifying eligibility or benefit amounts: Public assistance pursuant to the Colorado works program, as defined in section 26-2-703 (5); medicaid; food stamps; supplemental security income benefits; cash assistance programs pursuant to this title; public assistance as defined in section 26-2-103 (7); child care assistance pursuant to part 1 of article 4 of title 26.5; and unemployment compensation.

Information contained within the reports shall be available to the department of labor and employment and the state agency operating the workers' compensation program.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1298, § 43, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2) and (8)(b) amended, p. 947, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2013:

(1)(d) added and (2) and (3) amended, (HB 13-1209), ch. 103, p. 354, § 4, effective January 1, 2014.

L. 2021:

(1)(a), (1)(b), and (3) amended, (HB 21-1220), ch. 212, p. 1129, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(8)(b) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 860, § 106, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997. For the legislative intent contained in the 2006 act amending subsections (2) and (8)(b), see section 8(2) of chapter 208, Session Laws of Colorado 2006.

26-13-126. Authority to deny, suspend, or revoke professional, occupational, and recreational licenses - definitions.

The state board of human services is authorized, in coordination with any state agency, board, or commission that is authorized by law to issue, revoke, deny, terminate, or suspend a professional, occupational, or recreational license, to promulgate rules for the suspension, revocation, or denial of professional, occupational, and recreational licenses of individuals who owe more than six months' gross dollar amount of child support and who are paying less than fifty percent of their current monthly child support obligation each month, or those individuals who fail, after receiving proper notice, to comply with subpoenas or warrants relating to paternity or child support proceedings.

To effectuate the purposes of this section, the executive director of the state department may request the denial, suspension, or revocation of any professional, occupational, or recreational license issued by a state agency, board, or commission, referred to in this section as the "licensing agency". Upon such request, the state child support enforcement agency shall send a notice to the obligor by first class mail stating that the obligor has thirty days after the date of the notice within which to pay the past-due obligation, to negotiate a payment plan with the state child support enforcement agency, to request an administrative hearing with the delegate child support enforcement unit, or to comply with the warrant or subpoena. If the obligor fails to pay the past-due obligation, negotiate a payment plan, request an administrative hearing, or comply with the warrant or subpoena within thirty days after the date of the notice, the state child support enforcement agency shall send a notice to the licensing agency to deny, revoke, or suspend the professional, occupational, or recreational license of the individual identified as not in compliance with the court or administrative order for current child support, child support debt, retroactive child support, child support arrearages, or child support when combined with maintenance or of the individual who failed, after receiving appropriate notice, to comply with subpoenas or warrants relating to paternity or child support proceedings.

The rules promulgated to implement this section shall provide that, if it is the first time the procedures authorized by this section have been employed to enforce support against the obligor, the state child support enforcement agency may only issue a notice to the licensing agency to suspend or to deny such obligor's license. However, the rules shall also provide that, in second and subsequent circumstances in which the provisions of this section are utilized to enforce support against the obligor, the state child support enforcement agency shall be authorized to issue a notice to the licensing agency to revoke an obligor's license, subject to full reapplication procedures upon compliance as specified by the licensing agency.

No later than thirty days after the date of the notice to the obligor, the obligor may request in writing that the delegate child support enforcement unit conduct an administrative review pursuant to the rules and regulations developed by the state board to implement the provisions of this article.

No later than thirty days after the date of the delegate child support enforcement unit's decision, the obligor may request in writing an administrative review from the state child support enforcement agency.

The sole issues to be determined at the administrative review by both the delegate child support enforcement unit and the state child support enforcement agency shall be whether there is: A mistake in the identity of the obligor; a disagreement concerning the amount of the child support debt, an arrearage balance, retroactive support due, or the amount of the past-due child support when combined with maintenance; a showing that all child support payments were made when due; a showing that the individual has complied with the subpoena or warrant; a showing that the individual was not properly served with the subpoena or warrant; or a showing that there was a technical defect with respect to the subpoena or warrant.

The decision of the state child support enforcement agency shall be final agency action and may be reviewed pursuant to section 24-4-106, C.R.S.

A notice to the licensing agency pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall not be sent to the licensing agency unless the obligor has failed to request a review within the time specified or until a hearing has been concluded and all rights of review have been exhausted.

Each licensing agency affected may promulgate rules, as necessary, and procedures to implement the requirements of this section. Such licensing agencies shall enter into memoranda of understanding, as necessary, with the state child support enforcement agency with respect to the implementation of this section. All due process hearings shall be conducted by the state department rather than the licensing agency.

Nothing in this section shall limit the ability of each licensing agency to deny, suspend, or revoke a license on any other grounds provided by law.

A licensing agency, or any person acting on its behalf, shall not be liable for any actions taken to deny, suspend, or revoke the obligor's license pursuant to this section.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the same or similar conditions placed upon the issuance and renewal of a state license to practice a profession or occupation, as set forth in this section, should also be placed upon persons applying to or licensed to practice law. The general assembly, however, recognizes the practice of the Colorado Supreme Court in the licensure, registration, and discipline of persons practicing law in this state. Specifically, the general assembly acknowledges that in order to obtain a license to practice law in Colorado, a person must verify that he or she is not delinquent with respect to a court-ordered obligation to pay child support. In addition, the general assembly recognizes that pursuant to the "Colorado Rules of Professional Conduct" a lawyer may be disciplined, including by disbarment, for failing to pay child support.

Subject to section 24-33-110 (1), C.R.S., for purposes of this section, "license" means any recognition, authority, or permission that the state or any principal department of the state or an agent of such department is authorized by law to issue for an individual to practice a profession or occupation or for an individual to participate in any recreational activity. "License" may include, but is not necessarily limited to, any license, certificate, certification, letter of authorization, or registration issued for an individual to practice a profession or occupation or for an individual to participate in any recreational activity.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1300, § 43, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(4) amended, p. 1076, § 1, effective May 21.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997.

(2) For the "Colorado Rules of Professional Conduct", see the appendix to chapters 18 to 20 of the Colorado Rules of Civil Procedure.

26-13-127. State case registry.

The state department, or its agent, shall establish, maintain, update, and monitor an automated state case registry which shall include all cases in which child support orders have been established or modified on or after October 1, 1998.

The judicial department shall collect and electronically transfer on a weekly basis, or more frequently as mutually agreeable, to the state department, or its agent, the following basic elements of all child support orders established or modified on or after October 1, 1998, which shall be stored in the state case registry:

The name of the court, the county, and the case number;

The names of the obligor, the obligee, and the children who are the subject of the order;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1350, § 8, effective July 1, 2008.)

The date of birth of each parent and of each child for whom the order requires the payment of child support;

The date the child support order was established or modified;

The amount of monthly or other periodic support owed under the order.

(2.5) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, the parties shall provide the judicial department with the social security number of each party and each child who is the subject of a child support order. The judicial department shall collect and electronically transfer the social security numbers to the state department, or its agent, on a weekly basis or more frequently, as per mutual agreement. Nothing in this subsection (2.5) shall require that a person's social security number appear on the face of any court order entered pursuant to section

14-10-115

,

14-14-104

, or

19-4-116

, C.R.S., or section

26-13-114

or

26-13.5-105

.

For each case in which services are being provided under Title IV-D of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, and for which a support order has been established or modified, the state case registry shall include the basic information listed in subsection (2) of this section and the following additional information:

Amounts owed, including arrears, interest, or late payment penalties and fees, due or past-due, under the order;

The distribution of collected amounts;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 98, p. 763, § 13, effective July 1, 1998.)

The amount of any lien imposed with respect to the order pursuant to section

14-10-122

(1.5), C.R.S.

Information in the state case registry shall be accessible only by the state child support enforcement agency, the delegate child support enforcement units, the federal office of child support enforcement, the courts, or the agents of such agency, units, office, or courts.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1303, § 43, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 763, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(2) amended, p. 1090, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2)(c) amended and (2.5) added, p. 1350, § 8, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997.